Tennessee, session 114, SB2608.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 55, Chapter 21, is amended by adding
the following as a new part:
55-21-401. Part definitions.
As used in this part:
(1) "Developmental disability" has the same meaning as in § 52-1-101;
(2) "Intellectual disability" has the same meaning as in § 52-1-101; and
(3) "Mental illness" means a psychiatric disorder.
55-21-402. Blue envelope development.
(a) The department of safety shall develop and design for a driver with a
developmental or intellectual disability a blue envelope that holds the driver's essential
documents, including a driver license, proof of insurance, vehicle registration, and
contact card.
(b) The blue envelope, as described in subsection (a), must include
communication guidelines on the exterior that are tailored to assist a law enforcement
officer in recognizing a person with a developmental or intellectual disability and
adapting the officer's approach when interacting with a driver with such disability.
55-21-403. Green envelope development.
SB2608
011328
- 1 -

(a) The department of safety shall develop and design for a driver with a mental
illness a green envelope that holds the driver's essential documents, including a driver
license, proof of insurance, vehicle registration, and contact card.
(b) The green envelope, as described in subsection (a), must include
communication guidelines on the exterior that are tailored to assist a law enforcement
officer in recognizing a person with a mental illness and adapting the officer's approach
when interacting with a driver with a mental illness.
55-21-404. Envelope request.
(a) Beginning on January 1, 2027, a person with a developmental or intellectual
disability or a mental illness may request a blue or green envelope, as described in this
part, from a driver services center or county clerk's office.
(b) The department of safety shall ensure such envelopes are made available
pursuant to this section in each driver services center and county clerk's office in this
state.
55-21-405. Rules.
The department of safety is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate this part.
The rules must be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative
Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.
SECTION 2. The headings in this act are for reference purposes only and do not
constitute a part of the law enacted by this act. However, the Tennessee Code Commission is
requested to include the headings in any compilation or publication containing this act.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 011328